North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-02 General Property Assessment

57-02-01.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Agricultural property” means platted or unplatted lands used for raising agricultural crops or grazing farm animals, except lands platted and assessed as agricultural property prior to March 30, 1981, shall continue to be assessed as agricultural property until put to a use other than raising agricultural crops or grazing farm animals. Agricultural property includes land on which a greenhouse or other building is located if the land is used for a nursery or other purpose associated with the operation of the greenhouse. The time limitations contained in this section may not be construed to prevent property that was assessed as other than agricultural property from being assessed as agricultural property if the property otherwise qualifies under this subsection.

Property platted on or after March 30, 1981, is not agricultural property when any four of the following conditions exist:

The land is platted by the owner.

Public improvements, including sewer, water, or streets, are in place.

Topsoil is removed or topography is disturbed to the extent that the property cannot be used to raise crops or graze farm animals.

Property is zoned other than agricultural.

Property has assumed an urban atmosphere because of adjacent residential or commercial development on three or more sides.

The parcel is less than ten acres [4.05 hectares] and not contiguous to agricultural property.

The property sells for more than four times the county average true and full agricultural value.

Land that was assessed as agricultural property at the time the land was put to use for extraction of oil, natural gas, or subsurface minerals as defined in section 38-12-01 must continue to be assessed as agricultural property if the remainder of the surface owner’s parcel of property on which the subsurface mineral activity is occurring continues to qualify for assessment as agricultural property under this subsection.

“Air carrier transportation property” means the operative property of each airline whose property is assessed for taxation purposes pursuant to chapters 57-06 and 57-32.

“Assessed valuation” means fifty percent of the true and full value of property.

“Centrally assessed property” means all property which is assessed by the state board of equalization under chapters 57-05, 57-06, and 57-32.

“Commercial property” means all property, or portions of property, not included in the classes of property defined in subsections 1, 4, 11, and 12.

“Credits” means and includes every claim and demand for money or other valuable thing, and every annuity or sum of money receivable at stated periods, due or to become due, and all claims and demands secured by deeds or mortgages, due or to become due.

“Governing body” means a board of county commissioners, city council, board of city commissioners, school board, or board of education, or the similarly constituted and acting board of any other municipality.

“Money” or “moneys” means gold and silver coin, treasury notes, bank notes, and every deposit which any person owning the same or holding in trust and residing in this state is entitled to withdraw as money or on demand.

“Municipality” or “taxing district” means a county, city, township, school district, water conservation and flood control district, Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, county park district, joint county park district, irrigation district, park district, rural fire protection district, or any other subdivision of the state empowered to levy taxes.

“Person” includes a firm, corporation, or limited liability company.

“Railroad property” means the operating property, including franchises, of each railroad operated in this state, including any electric or other street or interurban railway.

“Residential property” means all property, or portions of property, used by an individual or group of individuals as a dwelling, including property upon which a mobile home is located but not including hotel and motel accommodations required to be licensed under chapter 23-09 nor structures providing living accommodations for four or more separate family units nor any tract of land upon which four or more mobile homes are located.

“Taxable valuation” signifies the valuation remaining after deducting exemptions and making other reductions from the original assessed valuation, and is the valuation upon which the rate of levy finally is computed and against which the taxes finally are extended.

“Tract”, “lot”, “piece or parcel of real property”, or “piece or parcel of land” means any contiguous quantity of land in the possession of, owned by or recorded as the property of, the same claimant, person, or company.

“True and full value” means the value determined by considering the earning or productive capacity, if any, the market value, if any, and all other matters that affect the actual value of the property to be assessed. This shall include, for purposes of arriving at the true and full value of property used for agricultural purposes, farm rentals, soil capability, soil productivity, and soils analysis.

“Unencumbered cash” means the total cash on hand in any fund, less the amount belonging to the fund in closed banks and less the amount of outstanding warrants, bills, accounts, and contracts which are chargeable against the fund.

There shall be a presumption that a unit of land is not a farm unless such unit contains a minimum of ten acres [4.05 hectares], and the taxing authority, in determining whether such presumption shall apply, shall consider such things as the present use, the adaptability to use, and how similar type properties in the immediate area are classified for tax purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 1; R.C. 1899, § 1176; R.C. 1905, § 1480; C.L. 1913, § 2074; S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 14; R.C. 1943, § 57-0201; S.L. 1957, ch. 176, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 57-0201; S.L. 1963, ch. 375, § 2; 1963, ch. 376, § 1; 1969, ch. 469, § 1; 1971, ch. 533, § 1; 1979, ch. 586, § 1; 1981, ch. 564, § 5; 1981, ch. 805, § 1; 1981, ch. 806, §§ 3, 7; 1983, ch. 592, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 34; 1983, ch. 594, § 1; 1985, ch. 599, § 1; 1989, ch. 688, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1997, ch. 474, § 1; 2005, ch. 544, § 1; 2005, ch. 545, § 4; 2011, ch. 442, § 1.

Cross-References.

Supervision of assessors, see N.D.C.C. §§ 57-01-02, 57-01-05.

57-02-01.1.
Certification of assessors.

The state supervisor of assessments shall certify assessors as provided in this section.

To be certified as a class I assessor, an individual must:

Have a high school diploma or its equivalent.

Successfully complete one hundred eighty hours of assessment and appraisal instruction approved by the state supervisor of assessments. The number of hours of instruction determined necessary by the state supervisor of assessments for each of the following topics is required:

Tax administration.

Principles and theory of value.

Residential property appraisal.

Commercial property appraisal.

Agricultural property valuation.

To be certified as a class II assessor, an individual must:

Have a high school diploma or its equivalent.

Successfully complete eighty hours of assessment and appraisal instruction approved by the state supervisor of assessments. The number of hours of instruction determined necessary by the state supervisor of assessments for each of the following topics is required:

Tax administration.

Principles and theory of value.

Residential property appraisal.

Commercial property appraisal.

Agricultural property valuation.

The state supervisor of assessments may allow credit against required instruction in any topic under subdivision b of subsection 1 and subdivision b of subsection 2 upon receipt of documented training in this state or another state in the topic.

An individual appointed as an assessor must hold the required assessor certificate at the time of appointment or obtain that certificate within two years after initial appointment or by July 31, 2017, whichever is later. An assessor who does not obtain the required certificate within two years after initial appointment or by July 31, 2017, whichever is later, or who does not maintain that certificate in good standing is not eligible for re-appointment.

An assessor certificate is valid for a term of two years from the first day of the calendar year for which it becomes effective.

A class I assessor certificate may be renewed if the holder has completed twenty hours of approved classroom instruction or seminars during the term of the certificate. For purposes of this subsection, an assessor certificate holder is entitled to one and one-half hours of credit for each hour spent as an instructor of approved classroom instruction or seminars during the term of the certificate.

A class II assessor certificate may be renewed if the holder has completed ten hours of approved classroom instruction or seminars during the term of the certificate.

The state supervisor of assessments shall notify the holder of an assessor certificate of the time for application for renewal of the individual’s certificate. The state supervisor of assessments shall notify the governing body of the taxing district employing an assessor whose certificate is not renewed or whose certificate is suspended or revoked.

Any person who is denied a certificate under this section may appeal to the tax commissioner for a hearing under chapter 28-32.

The tax commissioner may adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for the administration of this section.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 433, § 5, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-02-02.
Abbreviations used in land descriptions.

Abbreviations used in describing real estate may be as follows:

In all proceedings, lists, advertisements, records, notices, and documents relative to assessing, advertising, or selling real estate for taxes or special assessments, it is sufficient to describe such real estate by the use of initial letters, abbreviations, and figures to designate the township, range, section, or part of section, and the number of a lot or block.

Whenever the letters N., E., S., or W. are used, they must be construed to mean north, east, south, and west, respectively.

Whenever there are used the initial letters N.W., S.W., N.E., or S.E., whether in capital letters or small letters, and whether each letter is followed by a period or the two are written connectedly without a period to signify the same to be an abbreviation of two words, and whenever said letters are used in connection with section numbers to designate land descriptions, and in the absence of proof to the contrary, it must be presumed that the same are abbreviations for and mean “northwest”, “southwest”, “northeast”, and “southeast”, respectively.

When two or more sets of such abbreviations are used connectedly, as for example N.E. S.E., the same must be presumed to mean the “northeast quarter of the southeast quarter”.

When any such initial letters are followed with a numeral placed in the position of an algebraic exponent, as N.W.4, S.W.4, N.E.4, or S.E.4, with the figure placed on or above the line, the description must be taken to mean the “northwest quarter”, “southwest quarter”, “northeast quarter”, or “southeast quarter”, respectively. The abbreviation N.2, S.2, E.2, or W.2 must be presumed to mean the “north half”, “south half”, “east half”, or “west half”, respectively, of the section or quarter or other portion of land designated immediately following it.

Combinations of such letters and figures must be read accordingly, as S.2 N.E.4 must be taken as intended to mean and describe the “south half of the northeast quarter”, and similar combinations of such letters and exponents must be construed accordingly.

In the absence of such figure placed in the position of an exponent, whenever abbreviations N.W., S.W., N.E., or S.E. are used alone or with similar abbreviations, they must be presumed to mean and be read as “northwest quarter”, “southwest quarter”, “northeast quarter”, or “southeast quarter”, respectively, unless it appears clearly from the context that another meaning is intended.

The abbreviation sec. must be taken as meaning “section”, the letters “t” or “twp” or “tp” must be taken to mean “township”, the letters “r” or “rg” or “rge” must be taken to mean “range”, the abbreviations “b” or “blk” or “bk” must be taken to mean “block”, the abbreviations “add” or “ad” must be taken to mean “addition”, and the abbreviations “sub” or “subd” must be taken to mean “subdivision”.

The abbreviation “do” or the characters “ " ” or other similar abbreviation or character, must be construed to mean the same name, word, initial, letter, abbreviation, or figure as the last preceding one written or the one written immediately above.

No description in which the foregoing abbreviations, symbols, initial letters, figures, or characters definitely can be understood by the application of the definitions and rules in this section may be held defective because such abbreviations are used instead of words or figures symbolized thereby.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 98; R.C. 1899, § 1281; R.C. 1905, § 1600; C.L. 1913, § 2215; S.L. 1915, ch. 1, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 2215; R.C. 1943, § 57-0202.

57-02-03.
Property subject to taxation.

All property in this state is subject to taxation unless expressly exempted by law.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 28, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1176; S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 1177; R.C. 1905, § 1481; C.L. 1913, § 2075; R.C. 1943, § 57-0203; S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 1.

57-02-04.
Real property defined.

Real property, for the purpose of taxation, includes:

The land itself, whether laid out in town lots or otherwise, and improvements to the land, such as ditching, surfacing, and leveling, except plowing and trees, and all rights and privileges thereto belonging or in anywise appertaining, and all mines, minerals, and quarries in and under the same and shall expressly include all such improvements made by persons to lands held by them under the laws of the United States, all such improvements to land the title to which still is vested in any railroad company and which is not used exclusively for railroad purposes, and improvements to land belonging to any other corporation or limited liability company whose property is not subject to the same mode and rule of taxation as other property.

All structures and buildings, including manufactured homes as defined in section 41-09-02 with respect to which the requirements of subsections 1 through 3 of section 39-05-35, as applicable, have been satisfied, including systems for the heating, air-conditioning, ventilating, sanitation, lighting, and plumbing of such structures and buildings, and all rights and privileges thereto belonging or in anywise appertaining, but shall not include items which pertain to the use of such structures and buildings, such as machinery or equipment used for trade or manufacture which are not constructed as an integral part of and are not essential for the support of such structures or buildings, and which are removable without materially limiting or restricting the use of such structures or buildings.

Machinery and equipment, but not including small tools and office equipment, used or intended for use in any process of refining products from oil or gas extracted from the earth, but not including such equipment or appurtenances located on leased oil and gas production sites.

Source:

S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 3; R.C. 1899, § 1178; R.C. 1905, § 1482; C.L. 1913, § 2076; R.C. 1943, § 57-0204; S.L. 1967, ch. 416, § 1; 1971, ch. 534, § 1; 1979, ch. 587, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2009, ch. 327, § 13.

57-02-05.
Personal property defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 534, § 4.

57-02-05.1.
Personal property defined.

Personal property, for the purpose of taxation, includes all property that is not included within the definition of real property.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 534, § 2.

57-02-06.
Who are deemed merchants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.

57-02-07.
Who are deemed manufacturers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.